el: Μηχανισμός κίνησης δολώματος: Butt Kicker; Φτερά που χτυπούν; Κανένας (Στατικός); Παλμοδότης; Τρέμουλο/Δόνηση; Μηχανισμός κυματισμού; Περιστρεφόμενο καρουζέλ; Περιστρεφόμενα φτερά; Κολυμβητής; Με αέρα; Άλλο
vi: Cơ chế chuyển động của mồi nhử: Cử động đuôi; Cánh vỗ; Không (tĩnh); Tạo xung; Rung/lắc; Tạo gợn sóng; Vòng xoay; Cánh xoay; Bơi; Hoạt động bằng sức gió; Khác
sl-SI: Mehanizem gibanja vabe: Trzajoč zadek; Prhutajoče krilo; Brez (statično); Pulzator; Tresenje/vibracije; Mehanizem za valovanje; Vrtiljak; Vrtljivo krilo; Plavalec; Na veter; Drugo
sv: Mekanism för Motion: Butt Kicker; Flaxande vinge; Ingen (statisk); Pulsator; Darr/vibration; Vågskapare; Roterande karusell; Snurrande vinge; Simmare; Vinddriven; Övrigt
fr: Mécanisme d’animation du leurre: Agitateur de croupion; Ailes battantes; Aucun (statique); Pulsateur; Frémissement/vibration; Générateur d’ondulations; Carrousel rotatif; Ailes tournantes; Nageur; Alimenté par le vent; Autre
es: Mecanismo de movimiento del señuelo: Butt Kicker; Alas batientes; Ninguno (estático); Pulsador; Temblor/vibración; Generador de ondas; Carrusel giratorio; Alas giratorias; Nadador; Impulsado por el viento; Otro
zh-CN: 假饵动作机制: 蹬腿式 (Butt Kicker); 拍翼式 (Flapping Wing); 无（静态）; 脉动式 (Pulsator); 颤动/振动式; 激流式 (Ripple Maker); 旋转木马式; 旋翼式 (Spinning Wing); 游泳式 (Swimmer); 风力驱动式; 其他
ja: デコイのMotionメカニズム: バットキッカー; フラッピングウィング; なし (静的); パルセーター; クイーバー/振動; リップルメーカー; 回転カルーセル; スピニングウィング; スイマー; 風力式; その他
pt-BR: Mecanismo de movimento da isca: Butt Kicker; Asa batendo; Nenhum (Estático); Pulsador; Tremor/vibração; Gerador de ondas; Carrossel rotativo; Asa giratória; Nadador; Movido a vento; Outro
nl: Lokaas bewegingsmechanisme: Butt kicker; Klapwiekend; Geen (statisch); Pulsator; Trillend/vibratie; Rimpelmaker; Draaiende carrousel; Draaiende vleugel; Zwemmer; Windgedreven; Overige
sk-SK: Mechanizmus pohybu návnady: Butt Kicker; Mávajúce krídla; Žiadny (statický); Pulzátor; Chvenie/vibrácie; Vytvárač vlniek; Rotačný kolotoč; Rotujúce krídla; Plavec; Poháňaný vetrom; Iné
ru: Механизм движения манка: Имитация кормления; Машущие крылья; Нет (статичное); Пульсатор; Дрожание/вибрация; Создание ряби; Вращающаяся карусель; Вращающиеся крылья; Имитация плавания; Механизм от ветра; Другое
bg-BG: Механизъм за движение на примамката: Butt Kicker; С махащи крила; Няма (статична); Пулсатор; Трептене/вибрация; Създаваща вълнички; Въртяща се въртележка; С въртящи се крила; Плуваща; Задвижвана от вятъра; Друго
lt-LT: Masalo judėjimo mechanizmas: „Butt Kicker“; Plasnojantis sparnas; Nėra (statinis); Pulsatorius; Virpantis / vibruojantis; Vandens bangavimo mechanizmas; Besisukanti karuselė; Besisukantis sparnas; Plaukikas; Vėjo varomas; Kita
da: Lokkemidlets bevægelsesmekanisme: Butt kicker; Baskende vinger; Ingen (statisk); Pulsator; Dirren/vibration; Ripple maker; Roterende karrusel; Roterende vinger; Svømmer; Vinddreven; Andet
nb: Mekanisme for bevegelse: Butt Kicker; Flaksende ving; Ingen (statisk); Pulsator; Dirring/vibrasjon; Ripple Maker; Roterende karusell; Spinnende vinge; Svømmer; Vinddrevet; Annet
ro-RO: Mecanismul de mișcare a momelii: Butt Kicker; Aripi batante; Fără (static); Pulsator; Tremur/Vibrație; Generator de unde; Carusel rotativ; Aripi rotative; Înotător; Acționat de vânt; Altele
fi: Syötin liikemekanismi: Butt Kicker; Räpyttelevä siipi; Ei mikään (staattinen); Pulsaattori; Tärisevä/värisevä; Väreen tekijä; Pyörivä karuselli; Pyörivä siipi; Uiva; Tuulivoimalla toimiva; Muu
tr: Mühre hareket mekanizması: Su sıçratıcı (butt kicker); Çırpan kanat; Yok (statik); Pulsatör; Titreşim; Dalga yapıcı; Dönen atlıkarınca; Dönen kanat; Yüzen; Rüzgar gücüyle çalışan; Diğer
hr-HR: Mehanizam mamca za pokret: Butt Kicker; Mahanje krilima; Ništa (statično); Pulsator; Drhtanje / vibracije; Stvaranje mreškanja; Rotirajući vrtuljak; Rotirajuće krilo; Plivač; Na pogon vjetrom; Ostalo
cs: Mechanismus pohybu nástrahy/balabánu: Butt Kicker; Mávající křídlo; Žádný (statický); Pulzátor; Třes/vibrace; Tvůrce vlnek; Rotační kolotoč; Rotující křídlo; Plavec; Poháněný větrem; Jiné
ko: 미끼 동작 메커니즘: 버트 키커; 플래핑 윙; 없음(정적); 펄세이터; 퀴버/진동; 리플 메이커; 회전식 카루셀; 스피닝 윙; 스위머; 풍력 구동; 기타
de: Bewegungsmechanismus des Lockvogels: Butt Kicker; Schlagende Flügel; Keine (statisch); Pulsator; Zittern/Vibration; Wellenerzeuger; Rotierendes Karussell; Rotierende Flügel; Schwimmer; Windbetrieben; Sonstige
pl: Mechanizm ruchu wabika: Butt Kicker; Machające skrzydła; Brak (statyczny); Pulsator; Drgania/Wibracje; Ripple Maker; Karuzela obrotowa; Wirujące skrzydło; Pływak; Napędzane wiatrem; Inne
pt-PT: Mecanismo Motion do isco: Butt Kicker; Asas a bater; Nenhum (estático); Pulsador; Tremor/vibração; Criador de ondulação; Carrossel rotativo; Asa giratória; Nadador; A energia eólica; Outro
hu: Csali mozgási mechanizmusa: Farokcsapkodó; Csapkodó szárny; Nincs (statikus); Pulzáló; Rezgő/vibráló; Hullámkeltő; Forgó karusszel; Forgó szárny; Úszó; Szélhajtású; Egyéb
en: Decoy motion mechanism: Butt Kicker; Flapping Wing; None (Static); Pulsator; Quiver/Vibration; Ripple Maker; Rotating Carousel; Spinning Wing; Swimmer; Wind Powered; Other
it: Meccanismo Motion dell'esca: Butt kicker; Ali battenti; Nessuno (statico); Pulsatore; Tremolio/vibrazione; Generatore di increspature; Giostra rotante; Ali rotanti; Nuotatore; A vento; Altro
zh-TW: 誘餌動作機制: 踢水器; 拍動翅膀; 無 (靜態); 脈動器; 顫動/震動; 漣漪製造器; 旋轉底座; 旋轉翅膀; 游泳; 風力驅動; 其他
th: กลไกการเคลื่อนไหวของเหยื่อล่อ: Butt Kicker; ปีกกระพือ; ไม่มี (อยู่นิ่ง); ตัวสั่นพ่นน้ำ; ตัวสั่นระริก; ตัวสร้างคลื่นน้ำ; หมุนแบบม้าหมุน; ปีกหมุน; แบบว่ายน้ำ; ขับเคลื่อนด้วยลม; อื่นๆ